Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.343.340

When elected—Eligibility.

Directors of school districts shall be elected at regular school elections. No person shall be eligible to the office of school director who is not a citizen of the United States and the state of Washington and a registered voter of either the school district or director district, as the case may be.

[ 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.57.318. Prior: 1909 c 97 p 285 s 1; RRS s 4775; prior: 1903 c 104 s 16; 1901 c 41 s 2; 1899 c 142 s 7; 1897 c 118 s 39; 1893 c 107 s 2; 1890 p 364 s 25. Formerly RCW 28A.315.490, 28A.57.318, 28.58.090.]